Hawaii, session 2025, GM1248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 338-14.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§338-14.5 Copies of certificate; fees. The fees for
certified copies of birth, marriage, divorce, or death
certificates issued by the department of health shall consist of
$10 for the first copy issued and $4 for each copy issued
thereafter. These fees shall be collected for each single
request for certified copies. All fees received for the
issuance of certified copies of birth, marriage, divorce, or
death certificates shall be remitted to the director of health.
Upon the receipt of remittances under this section, the director
of health shall deposit:
(1) $1 for each certified copy to the credit of the spouse
and child abuse special fund established under
section 346-7.5;
2025-2828 SB1422 GDI SMA.docx 1
■■MiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiHin

Page 2 S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(2) $1 for each certified copy to the credit of the spouse
and child abuse special account established under
section 601-3.6;
(3) $1 for each certified copy to the credit of the
S domestic violence and sexual assault special fund
established under section 321-1.3; and
(4) [^] The remainder of the fee for each certified copy
to the credit of the vital statistics improvement
special fund established under section 338-14.6
-(-5-)- The rcmaiH-der- of the fee for -each certified copy to
the credit of the otatc general fund]."
SECTION 2. Section 338-14.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) The fund shall consist of fees remitted pursuant to
[•seet-ien] sections 338-14.5 [-] and 572-5. All realizations of
the fund shall be subject to the conditions specified in
subsection (b)."
SECTION 3. Section 572-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
"(a) The department of health shall appoint, and at its
pleasure remove, one or more suitable persons as agents
2025-2828 SB1422 CDl SMA.docx

Page 3 S.B. NO.
s"
C.D. 1
authorized to grant marriage licenses under this chapter in each
judicial circuit. The agents may issue licenses from any state
facility when deemed necessary by the director. Any agent
appointed under this subsection and receiving an application for
a marriage license shall collect from the applicant for the
license $60, of which the agent, except those provided for in
subsection (b), shall retain $9 for the agent's benefit and
compensation and shall remit $51 to the director of health.
Upon the receipt of remittances under this subsection, the
director of health shall deposit:
(1) $32 for each license issued to the credit of the
general fund of the State;
(2) $4.50 for each license issued to the credit of the
spouse and child abuse special fund established under
section 346-7.5;
(3) $4.50 for each license issued to the credit of the
spouse and child abuse special account established
under section 601-3.6; and
(4) $10 for each license issued to the credit of the
[birth dofccto opecial fund established under oeet-ien
2025-2828 SB1422 CDl SMA.docx 3
iiiiiiiiiiHiiiiinwmniiii

Page 4
S.B. NO. s"
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
321-426.] vital statistics improvement special fund
established under section 338-14.6.
(b) The department may appoint, as regular employees under
the civil service and classification laws, the number of
suitable persons as agents authorized to grant marriage licenses
for whom provision has been made in the general appropriation
act. In the case of these agents, the full amount collected
from applicants shall be remitted to the director of health.
Upon the receipt of remittances under this subsection, the
director of health shall deposit:
(1) $41 for each license issued to the credit of the
general fund of the State;
(2) $4.50 for each license issued to the credit of the
spouse and child abuse special fund established under
section 346-7.5;
(3) $4.50 for each license issued to the credit of the
spouse and child abuse special account established
under section 601-3.6; and
(4) $10 for each license issued to the credit of the
[birth defccta opccial fund catabliahcd-under section
2025-2828 SB1422 GDI SMA.docx

Page 5
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
321-426. ] vital statistics improvement special fund
established under section 338-14.6."
SECTION 4. Section 321-426, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
["CS321 426]-- B-irth dGfcctg--epecial fund.-- There io
eotabliohed within -the otate trcaoury the birth dcfecto opoeial
-g-und to-be adminiotered and expended by the department of
health,—into which oha-ll be depoaited feeo remitted purouant to
ocction 572 5 .--Meneyo in the opecial fund ohall be uocd for the
paywentr-og—the—eperabing—expenses—of—the—birth—degeebs
pregratH-r" ]
SECTION 5. Any unencumbered and unexpended balance
existing as of the effective date of this Act in the birth
defects special fund established under section 321-426, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, shall be deposited into the vital statistics
improvement special fund, established under section 338-14.6,
Hawaii Revised Statutes.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2828 SB1422 CDl SMA.docx

S.B. NO. s"
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of June , 2025

S.B. No. 1422, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
'resident of the^enate
114

SB No. 1422, SD 1, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives